Colorado statutes. TITLE 32 Special Districts
PART 5 METROPOLITAN SEWAGE DISPOSAL DISTRICTS
32-4-509. Board of directors.

All powers, rights, privileges, and duties vested in or imposed upon any district organized under this part 5 shall be exercised and performed by and through a board of directors; but the exercise of any executive, administrative, and ministerial powers may be, by said board of directors, delegated and redelegated to officials and employees of the district; and the board of directors is authorized to create an executive committee of the board of directors and to delegate to such committee all of such power and authority to act on behalf of the district as the district board may determine by resolution or in the bylaws of the district.

The members of the board from each municipality shall be appointed by the executive of each such municipality with the approval of the governing body of such municipality. In districts having eleven or more member municipalities, the board shall consist of one member from each municipality included within the district for each seventy-five thousand of population, or fraction thereof, in such municipality, plus one member for each additional seventy-five thousand of population, or fraction thereof, in any such municipality; except that no municipality shall be entitled to more than one-half of the total membership or representation upon the board; and further except that any municipality that has fifty percent or more of the total population of the district shall have one-half of the total membership or representation on the board. In districts having ten or less member municipalities, the board shall consist of one member from each municipality included within the district, plus two additional members for any municipality having fifty percent of the total district population, plus one additional member for any municipality having eighty percent of the total district population.

In determining population for the purpose of apportioning and reapportioning representation on the board of directors of the district, the population of a city or of a city and county or of an incorporated town shall be the latest estimate made by the division of planning.

For the purpose of apportioning or reapportioning representation on the board of directors, the population of a sanitation district, water and sanitation district, or other political subdivision shall be determined by the governing body thereof by multiplying by 2.8 either the number of single-family equivalent water taps or the number of single-family equivalent sewer connections within the said water and sanitation district or other political subdivision or by multiplying by 2.8 the number of single-family equivalent sewer connections within the said sanitation district.

The representation on the board shall be reapportioned every four years after the creation of a district in the month in which the division of local government in the department of local affairs issued a certificate of organization in the year of the district's organization upon the basis set forth in this subsection (2).

After a district is organized, the inclusion thereafter of additional municipalities within the district shall entitle the included municipalities to representation on the board of directors of the district on the same basis as other municipalities. Should the addition of such membership to the board result in a municipality which has fifty percent or more of the population of the district having less than fifty percent of the total membership or representation on the board of directors, that municipality's representation shall be increased simultaneously so that it shall have one-half of the total membership or representation on said board. This paragraph (e) shall not apply to districts having, after the addition of such municipality, ten or less municipalities.

Board members shall be qualified electors who are qualified to vote at general elections in this state and who reside within the district and within the municipality from which they are appointed. The term of each member shall be two years; except that the terms of the members of the first board of directors shall be adjusted so that the terms of one-half of the members shall expire one year thereafter. In each calendar year any term of office then terminating shall expire as soon as the incumbent's successor has been appointed and qualifies after the last day of the month next following the month in which the division of local government issued a certificate of organization in the year of the district's organization. At the first meeting of the board of a newly formed district, the directors shall determine by lot who shall serve for one-year terms and who shall serve for two-year terms. At the expiration of a director's term a new appointment shall be made by the appropriate executive, with the approval of the governing body, and any member may be appointed to succeed himself. The executive, at his discretion, may remove from office any member of the board representing his municipality and appoint a successor with the approval of the governing body.

A change of residence of a member of a board of directors to a place outside the area which he represents shall constitute an automatic resignation and shall create a vacancy on the board. Vacancies which occur on the board through death or resignation or by change of residence or for any other reason shall be filled in the same manner as original appointments.

Upon the creation of a district the executive of each municipality within the district shall appoint, with the approval of the governing body, the members of the board of directors of said district to which such municipality is entitled and the directors so appointed by the executive of the municipality which adopted the initiating ordinance shall fix a time and place for the first meeting of the members of the board of directors and shall cause each director to be given written notice thereof at least five days prior thereto.

All special and regular meetings of the board shall be open to the public. Such meetings shall be held at locations which are within the boundaries of the district or which are within the boundaries of any county in which the district is located, in whole or in part, or in any county so long as the meeting location does not exceed twenty miles from the district boundaries. The provisions of this subsection (6) governing the location of meetings may be waived only if the following criteria are met:

The proposed change of location of a meeting of the board appears on the agenda of a regular or special meeting of the board; and

A resolution is adopted by the board stating the reason for which a meeting of the board is to be held in a location other than under the provisions of this subsection (6) and further stating the date, time, and place of such meeting.

The board of directors has the following powers:

To fix the time and place, or places, at which its regular meetings shall be held and shall provide for the calling and holding of special meetings; to adopt bylaws and rules for procedure; to select one of its members as chairman of the board and district, and another member as pro tem chairman of the board and district; and to choose a secretary and a treasurer of the board and district, each of which positions may be filled by a person who is a member of the board and both of which may be filled by one person;

To make and pass resolutions and orders not repugnant to the provisions of this part 5, necessary or proper for the government and management of the affairs of the district, for the execution of the powers vested in the district, and for carrying into effect the provisions of this part 5. On all resolutions and orders the roll shall be called and the ayes and noes recorded. All resolutions and orders, as soon as may be after their passage, shall be recorded in a book kept for that purpose and be authenticated by the signature of the presiding officer of the board of directors and the secretary. Every legislative act of the board or its executive committee of a general or permanent nature shall be by resolution. The book of resolutions and orders shall be a public record.

Business of the board shall be transacted at a regular or special meeting at which a quorum consisting of one-half of the total membership of the board of directors is present. Any action of the board shall require the affirmative vote of the majority of the directors present and voting, except when a weighted vote is conducted in accordance with the bylaws of the district, applicable resolutions of the board, or other laws or rules governing the procedures of the board. Questions involving inclusion or exclusion of territories or authorizing any expenditures in excess of fifty thousand dollars shall require the approval of a majority of the entire membership of the board. A majority of the entire membership of the board may authorize by resolution any project authorized in this part 5 and also thereby authorize expenditures from time to time appertaining to such project in excess of fifty thousand dollars approved by an affirmative vote of the majority of the directors present and voting at any subsequent meeting. A smaller number of directors than a quorum may adjourn from time to time and may compel the attendance of absent members in such manner and under such penalties as the board may provide.

To fix the location of the principal place of business of the district and the location of all offices and departments maintained under this part 5;

To prescribe by resolution a system of business administration and to create all necessary offices, and to establish and reestablish the powers and duties and compensation of all officers and employees and to require and fix the amount of all official bonds necessary for the protection of the funds and property of the district;

To prescribe a method of auditing and allowing or rejecting claims and demands and a method for the letting of contracts on a fair and competitive basis for the construction of works, structures, or equipment, or the performance or furnishing of labor, materials, or supplies as required for the carrying out of any of the purposes of this part 5;

To designate and appoint an official newspaper within each county in which the district or any portion thereof is situated to be used for the official publications of the district; but nothing contained in this subsection (7) shall prevent the board from directing publication in additional newspapers where public necessity may so require. Any official newspaper so designated and appointed shall be one which is published within the district.

To appoint, by written resolution, one or more persons to act as custodians of moneys of the district for purposes of depositing such moneys as set forth in section 32-4-510 (1)(p). Such persons shall deposit, or cause to be deposited, all or part of such moneys in such depositories as shall be designated by the board and shall give surety bonds in such amounts and form and for such purposes as the board requires.

Each member of the board shall receive as compensation for his or her service a sum not in excess of three thousand dollars per annum, payable at a rate not to exceed seventy-five dollars for each regular or special meeting of the board or committee of the board attended by the member. No member of the board shall receive any compensation as an agent, employee, engineer, or attorney of the district.

No member of the board, nor officer, employee, or agent of a district shall be interested in any contract or transaction with the district except in his official representative capacity or as provided in his contract of employment with the district. Neither the holding of any office or employment in the government of any municipality or other public body of the federal government, nor the owning of any property within the state shall be deemed a disqualification for membership on the board or membership in or employment by a district, nor a disqualification for compensation for services as a member of the board or as an officer, employee, or agent of the district, except as provided in subsection (8) of this section.

Source:

L. 60:

p. 166, § 5.

CRS 53:

§ 89-15-5.

L. 62:

p. 185, § 3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-15-5.

L. 65:

p. 880, § 1.

L. 70:

p. 286, § 85.

L. 71:

pp. 975, 976, §§ 1, 2, 3.

L. 76:

(2)(d) and (3) amended, p. 601, § 18, effective July 1.

L. 77:

(8) R&RE, p. 1505, § 55, effective July 15; (8) R&RE, p. 1521, § 1, effective January 1, 1978.

L. 79:

(7)(h) added, p. 1624, § 35, effective June 8.

L. 81:

(2)(a), (2)(c), and (8) amended, p. 1637, § 2, effective May 8; (2)(e) amended, p. 1637, § 2, effective May 18.

L. 90:

(6) amended, p. 1498, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

(2)(a), (2)(d), and (8) amended, p. 160, § 1, effective March 22.

L. 2010:

(7)(c) amended, (SB 10-053), ch. 22, p. 94, § 1, effective August 11.

32-4-510. Powers of the district.

Any district has the following powers:

To have powers, privileges, immunities, rights, liabilities, no-rights, disabilities, and duties appertaining to a public body politic and corporate constituting a quasi-municipal district and political subdivision of the state established as an instrumentality exercising public and essential governmental and proprietary functions to provide for the public health, safety, and general welfare; and to have perpetual existence and succession;

To adopt, have, and use a corporate seal, and to alter the same at pleasure;

To sue and to be sued;

To enter into contracts and agreements including but not limited to contracts with the federal government and the state;

To borrow money and to issue securities evidencing any loan to or amount due by the district, to provide for and secure the payment of any securities and the rights of the holders thereof, and to purchase, hold, and dispose of securities, as provided in this part 5;

To purchase, trade, exchange, lease, buy, sell, encumber, and otherwise acquire and dispose of real and personal property and interests therein, including water and water rights;

To refund any bonded indebtedness of the district without an election;

In addition to all other means of providing revenue as provided in this section, during the first five years of the district's existence, to levy general ad valorem taxes on all taxable property within the district; but the total tax levy for the five-year period shall not exceed an aggregate total of three-fourths of one mill. When the district, within said period of five years, has levied taxes to the total of three-fourths of one mill, or when the district has been organized for a full five-year period, whichever occurs first, the district shall have no further power to levy general ad valorem taxes. Nothing in this part 5 shall be construed as preventing the collection of the proceeds in full of any tax levies authorized in this part 5, including but not limited to any delinquencies, as provided in this paragraph (h) and paragraph (m) of this subsection (1), and in section 32-4-511. The board, if it desires to levy in any year all or any portion of the mill levy tax authorized in this paragraph (h), shall, in accordance with the schedule prescribed by section 39-5-128, C.R.S., certify to the body having authority to levy taxes within each county wherein the district has any territory the rate so fixed, in order that, at the time and in the manner required by law for the levying of taxes, such body having authority to levy taxes shall levy such tax upon the valuation for assessment of all taxable property within the district. The levy and collection of taxes shall be as provided in section 32-4-511.

To hire and retain officers, agents, employees, engineers, attorneys, and any other persons, permanent or temporary, necessary or desirable to effect the purposes hereof, to defray any expenses incurred thereby in connection with the district, and to acquire office space, equipment, services, supplies, fire and extended coverage insurance, use and occupancy insurance, workers' compensation insurance, property damage insurance, public liability insurance for the district and its officers, agents, and employees, and other types of insurance, as the board may determine. No provision in this part 5 authorizing the acquisition of insurance shall be construed as waiving any immunity of the district or any director, officer, or agent thereof, and otherwise existing under the laws of the state.

To condemn property for public use;

To acquire, hold, operate, maintain, equip, improve, and dispose of a sewage disposal system and appurtenant works or any interest therein, wholly within the district, or partially within and partially without the district, and wholly within, wholly without, or partially within and partially without any public body all or any part of the area of which is situated within the district; to acquire and, subject to mortgages, deeds of trust, or other liens, or otherwise, to hold, operate, maintain, equip, improve, and dispose of property of every kind appertaining to any such sewage disposal system and any improvements thereto, and necessary or convenient to the full exercise of any power provided in this part 5; to pay or otherwise defray the cost of any project; to pay or otherwise defray and to contract so to pay or defray, without an election, the principal of, any interest on, and any other charges appertaining to any securities or other obligations of any municipality or person incurred in connection with any such property so acquired by the district; and to establish and maintain facilities within or without the district, across or along any public street, highway, bridge, viaduct, or other public right-of-way, or in, upon, under, or over any vacant public lands, which public lands are the property of the state, or across any stream of water or watercourse, without first obtaining a franchise from the municipality, county, or other public body having jurisdiction over the same, but the district shall cooperate with any public body having such jurisdiction, shall promptly restore any such street, highway, bridge, viaduct, or other public right-of-way to its former state of usefulness as nearly as may be, and shall not use the same in such manner as to impair completely or unnecessarily the usefulness thereof;

To fix and from time to time increase or decrease rates and charges to municipalities within the district for the services provided by the district, including the power to fix and determine minimum charges and charges for availability of service; to pledge such revenue for the payment of any securities of the district; and to enforce the collection of such rates and charges by civil action or by any other means provided by law;

To enforce the collection of rates and charges made by the district to any municipality which fails to pay any such rates and charges within ninety days after said rates and charges become due and payable, in addition to the foregoing powers and not in limitation thereof, by an action in the nature of mandamus or other suit, action, or proceeding at law or in equity to compel the levy without limitation as to rate or amount by the governing body of the municipality and the collection of general ad valorem taxes on and against all taxable property within the municipality sufficient in amount to pay such delinquent rates and charges, together with the expenses of collection, including but not necessarily limited to reasonable penalties for delinquencies, interest on the amount due from any date due at a rate of not exceeding one percent per month, or fraction thereof, court costs, reasonable attorneys' fees, and any other costs of collection. Nothing in this part 5 shall be so construed as to prevent the governing body of any municipality from levying such taxes sufficient for the payment of such rates and charges as the same become due and payable, nor from applying therefor any other funds that may be in the treasury of the municipality and available for that purpose, whether derived from any rates and charges imposed for the use of or otherwise in connection with its sewer system or sewer facilities, or from any other source, and upon such payments being made, the general ad valorem tax levy provided in this part 5 may thereupon to that extent be diminished. Except to that extent, there shall be levied without limitation of rate or amount by the governing body of each municipality, in addition to all other taxes, direct annual general ad valorem taxes on all taxable property within the municipality sufficient in amount to pay said rates and charges of the district promptly as the same respectively become due. The levy and collection of taxes shall be as provided in section 32-4-511.

To sell and otherwise dispose of any by-products resulting from the operation and activities of the district;

To appropriate revenues for the purpose of carrying on investigations and research in the treatment and disposal of sewage and industrial wastes;

To deposit any moneys of the district in any banking institution within or without the state or in any depository authorized in section 24-75-603, C.R.S., and to invest any surplus money in the district treasury, including such money in any sinking fund established for the purpose of retiring any securities of the district, not required for the immediate necessities of the district in securities meeting the investment requirements established in part 6 of article 75 of title 24, C.R.S., and such investment may be made by direct purchase of any such securities at the original sale of the same or by the subsequent purchase of such securities. Any securities thus purchased and held may be sold, from time to time, and the proceeds reinvested in securities, as provided in this paragraph (p). Sales of any securities thus purchased and held shall be made, from time to time, in season so that the proceeds may be applied to the purposes for which the money with which the securities were originally purchased was placed in the treasury of the district.

To accept contributions or loans from the federal government for the purpose of financing the planning, construction, maintenance, and operation of any enterprise in which the district is authorized to engage, and to enter into contracts and cooperate with, and accept cooperation from, the federal government in the planning, construction, maintenance, and operation, and in financing the planning, construction, maintenance, and operation, of any such enterprise in accordance with any legislation which congress may adopt, under which aid, assistance, and cooperation may be furnished by the federal government in the planning, construction, maintenance, and operation, or in financing the planning, construction, maintenance, and operation, of any such enterprise, including, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, costs of engineering, architectural, and economic investigations and studies, surveys, designs, plans, working drawings, specifications, procedures, and other action preliminary to the acquisition, improvement, or equipment of any project; and to do all things necessary in order to avail itself of such aid, assistance, and cooperation under any federal legislation enacted;

To enter, without an election, into joint operating or service contracts and agreements, acquisition, improvement, or disposal contracts or other arrangements with any municipality or person concerning sewage facilities, sewers, sewer systems, intercepting sewers, project or sewage disposal systems, and any water and water rights appertaining thereto, whether acquired by the district or by any public body or other person, and to accept grants and contributions from any public body or other person in connection therewith; and when determined by the board to be in the public interest and necessary for the protection of the public health, to enter into and perform, without an election, contracts and agreements with any municipality or person for the provision and operation by the district of sewage facilities, sewers, sewer systems, intercepting sewers, and a project or sewage disposal system to abate or reduce the pollution of waters or other nuisance caused by discharges of sewage, liquid wastes, solid wastes, night soil, and industrial wastes by the municipality or person, and for the payment periodically by the municipality or person to the district of amounts at least sufficient, in the determination of the board, to compensate the district for the cost of providing, operating, and maintaining the sewage facilities, sewers, sewer system, intercepting sewers, project, or sewage disposal system serving such municipality or person.

Subject to the rights and privileges of the holder or holders of any bonds or other securities of the district, any such joint operating or service contract between the district and ten or more municipalities may be amended, from time to time, by written agreement, duly authorized and signed by representatives of two-thirds of the parties thereto. This subparagraph (II) shall apply to any existing as well as any future joint operating or service contract entered into with such municipalities.

To enter into and perform, without an election, contracts and agreements with any municipality or person for or concerning the planning, construction, lease, or other acquisition, operation, maintenance, improvement, equipment, disposal, and the financing of any project;

To enter upon any land, to make surveys, borings, soundings, and examinations for the purposes of the district, in order to locate the necessary works of any project and any roadways and other rights-of-way appertaining to any project authorized in this part 5; to acquire all property necessary for the acquisition or improvement of said works, including lands for compensating reservoirs, and all necessary appurtenances;

To carry on technical and other investigations of all kinds, make measurements, collect data, and make analyses, studies, and inspections pertaining to water supply, water rights, control of floods, and use of water, sewage facilities, and any project, both within and without the district;

To have the right to provide from revenues or other available funds an adequate fund for the improvement of a sewage disposal system or of any parts of the works and properties of the district;

To prescribe and enforce reasonable rules and regulations for the availability of service from, the connection with, the use of, and the disconnection from a sewage disposal system, any other facilities, project, or other property of the district authorized in this part 5, and the operation of a sewage disposal system and any sewer system;

To make and keep records in connection with any project or otherwise concerning the district;

To arbitrate any differences arising in connection with any project or otherwise concerning the district;

To have the management, control, and supervision of all the business and affairs appertaining to any project authorized in this part 5, or otherwise concerning the district, and of the acquisition, improvement, equipment, operation, and maintenance of any such project;

To prescribe the duties of officers, agents, employees, and other persons, and fix their compensation, but the compensation of employees and officers shall be established at prevailing rates of pay for equivalent work;

To enter into contracts of indemnity and guaranty, in such form as may be approved by the board, relating to or connected with the performance of any contract or agreement which the district is empowered to enter into under the provisions of this part 5 or of any other law of the state;

To provide, by any contract, without an election:

For the joint use of personnel, equipment, and facilities of any district and public bodies, including sewer systems, sewage disposal plants, and public buildings constructed by or under the supervision of the board of a district or the governing body of the public body concerned, upon such terms and agreements, and within such areas within the district, as may be determined, for the promotion and protection of health, comfort, safety, life, welfare, and property of the inhabitants of the district and public bodies;

For the joint employment of clerks, stenographers, and other employees appertaining to any sewer system or sewage disposal system, or both, now existing or hereafter established in any district, upon such terms and conditions as may be determined for the equitable apportionment of the expenses therefrom resulting;

To obtain financial statements, appraisals, economic feasibility reports, and valuations of any type appertaining to any project or any property pertaining thereto;

To adopt any resolution authorizing a project or the issuance of securities, or both, or otherwise appertaining thereto, or otherwise concerning the district;

To make and execute a mortgage, deed of trust, indenture, or other trust instrument appertaining to a project or to any securities authorized in this part 5, or to both, except as provided in paragraph (gg) of this subsection (1) and in section 32-4-524 (8);

To make all contracts, execute all instruments, and do all things necessary or convenient in the exercise of the powers granted in this part 5, or in the performance of the district's covenants or duties, or in order to secure the payment of its securities, if no encumbrance, mortgage, or other pledge of property, excluding any money, of the district is created thereby, and if no property, excluding money, of the district is liable to be forfeited or taken in payment of said securities;

To have and exercise all rights and powers necessary or incidental to or implied from the specific powers granted in this part 5. Such specific powers shall not be considered as a limitation upon any power necessary or appropriate to carry out the purposes and intent of this part 5.

To exercise all or any part or combination of the powers granted in this part 5.

Source:

L. 60:

p. 169, § 6.

CRS 53:

§ 89-15-6.

L. 62:

pp. 188, 192, §§ 4, 5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-15-6.

L. 67:

p. 535, § 8.

L. 71:

p. 1214, § 10.

L. 77:

(1)(h) amended, p. 1505, § 56, effective July 15.

L. 79:

(1)(p) amended, p. 1624, § 36, effective June 8.

L. 81:

(1)(r) amended, p. 1638, § 3, effective May 8.

L. 89:

(1)(p) amended, p. 1118, § 37, effective July 1.

L. 90:

(1)(i) amended, p. 572, § 66, effective July 1.

L. 93:

(1)(k), (1)(r)(I), (1)(s), and IP(1)(cc) amended, p. 21, § 2, effective March 4.

32-4-511. Levy and collection of taxes.

It is the duty of the body having authority to levy taxes within each county to levy the taxes provided in this part 5. It is the duty of all officials charged with the duty of collecting taxes to collect such taxes at the time and in the form and manner and with like interest and penalties as other general ad valorem taxes are collected and when collected to pay the same to the district or municipality ordering its levy and collection. The payment of such collection shall be made monthly to the treasurer of the district or municipality levying the tax and be paid into the depository thereof to the credit of such district or municipality. All general ad valorem taxes levied under this part 5, together with interest thereon and penalties for default in payment thereof, and all costs of collecting the same, shall constitute, until paid, a perpetual lien on and against the property taxed, and such lien shall be on a parity with the tax lien of other general ad valorem taxes.

If the general ad valorem taxes levied are not paid, then delinquent real property shall be sold at the regular tax sale for the payment of said taxes, interest, and penalties, in the manner provided by the statutes of the state of Colorado for selling real property for the nonpayment of general taxes. If there are no bids at said tax sale for the property so offered, said property shall be struck off to the county, and the county shall account to the district or municipality to which the tax is due in the same manner as provided by law for accounting for school, town, and city taxes. Delinquent personal property shall be distrained and sold as provided by law.

Source:

L. 60:

p. 173, § 7.

CRS 53:

§ 89-15-7.

L. 62:

p. 194, § 6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-15-7.

32-4-512. Boundary changes - liability of property.

The boundaries of any district organized under this part 5 may be changed in the manner provided for in this part 5, but the change of boundaries of the district shall not impair or affect its organization, nor shall it affect, impair, or discharge any contract, obligation, lien, or charge on which the district might be liable or chargeable had such change of boundaries not been made.

Source:

L. 60:

p. 173, § 8.

CRS 53:

§ 89-15-8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-15-8.

32-4-513. Inclusion of territory.

Any municipality shall be eligible for inclusion in a district with the consent of such municipality and the consent of the district, upon such terms and conditions as may be determined by the board of directors of the district and upon determination by the board that such municipality may feasibly be served by the facilities of the district.

The governing body of a municipality desiring to include such municipality within the boundaries of the district shall submit to the district a request that the district determine the feasibility of serving the municipality through the district's facilities and the terms and conditions upon which the municipality may be included within the district.

Upon receipt of such a request the board of directors of the district shall cause an investigation to be made within a reasonable time to determine whether or not the municipality may feasibly be served by the facilities of the district and the terms and conditions upon which the municipality may be included within the district. Upon such determination, if it is determined that it is feasible to serve the municipality through the district's facilities, the board by resolution shall set the terms and conditions upon which the municipality may be included within the district and shall give notice thereof to the municipality. If the board determines that the municipality cannot feasibly be served through the district's facilities or otherwise determines that the municipality should not be included within the boundaries of the district, the board of directors of the district shall pass a resolution so stating and notify the municipality of the action of the board.

The governing body of the municipality, if it desires to include the municipality within the district upon the terms and conditions set forth by the board of directors of the district, shall adopt an ordinance declaring that the public health, safety, and general welfare require the inclusion of said municipality within the district and that the governing body desires to have said municipality included therein upon the terms and conditions prescribed by the board of directors of the district, but the governing body of such municipality shall, before final adoption of said ordinance, hold a public hearing thereon, notice of which shall be given by publication in at least one newspaper of general circulation within such municipality, which publication shall be complete at least ten days before the hearing. Upon the final adoption of said ordinance the clerk of the governing body of such municipality shall forthwith transmit a certified copy thereof to the board of directors of the district and to the division of local government in the department of local affairs.

After receipt of a copy of such ordinance the board of directors of the district may pass and adopt a resolution including said municipality within the boundaries of the district and shall cause a certified copy thereof to be transmitted to the division of local government and a certified copy to the clerk of the governing body of the municipality. The director of said division, upon receipt of a certified copy of the resolution of the board of directors of the district, shall forthwith issue a certificate reciting that the municipality described in such resolution has been duly included within the boundaries of the district according to the laws of the state of Colorado. The inclusion of such territory shall be deemed effective upon the date of the issuance of such certificate, and the validity of such inclusion shall be incontestable in any suit or proceeding which has not been commenced within three months from such date. The said division shall forthwith transmit to the governing body of such municipality and to the board of directors of the district three copies of such certificate, and the clerk of such governing body shall forthwith record a copy in the office of the clerk and recorder of each county in which such municipality is located and file a copy thereof with the county assessor and county treasurer of said county in which the municipality is located. The said division shall issue additional copies of the certificate upon request.

The foregoing provisions for inclusion of territory within the district shall be applicable in those cases where the municipality and the district take action to include only a portion of a municipality within the district, but in such instances the ordinance of the municipality, the resolution of the board of directors of the district, and the certificate of inclusion issued by the director of the division of local government shall specifically describe the area of the municipality which is included within the district.

Source:

L. 60:

p. 174, § 9.

CRS 53:

§ 89-15-9.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-15-9.

L. 76:

(3) and (4) amended, p. 601, § 19, effective July 1.